Maryland, session 2026, SB0697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
13–251.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONTENT” MEANS TEXT, IMAGES, VIDEOS, MEMES, GRAPHICS,
AND OTHER EXPRESSIVE MEDIA CREATED BY A PERSON THAT ARE SHARED OR
DISSEMINATED ON A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM.
(3) “LEGITIMATE BUSINESS PURPOSE” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
BUSINESS DECISION TO SUPPORT OR OPPOSE A CANDIDATE DUE TO THE PERCEIVED
COMMERCIAL OR FINANCIAL BENEFIT TO THE PERSON IF THE CANDIDATE WINS OR
LOSES THE ELECTION.
(4) “POLITICAL CONTENT” MEANS CONTENT THAT:
(I) EXPRESSES OPINIONS OR VIEWPOINTS ON A CLEARLY
IDENTIFIED CANDIDATE IN AN ELECTION THAT ARE DESIGNED TO INFLUENCE A
VOTER TO CAST A VOTE OR MAKE A VOTING DECISION IN THAT ELECTION; OR
(II) IS CAMPAIGN MATERIALS.
(5) “SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM” MEANS A WEBSITE OR MOBILE
APPLICATION THAT:
(I) ALLOWS USERS TO UPLOAD, CREATE, SHARE, AND VIEW
CONTENT TO SHARE WITH OTHER USERS; AND
(II) ENABLES USERS VIEWING CONTENT TO REACT, COMMENT,
OR SHARE THE CONTENT VIEWED BY THE USER;
(III) ALLOWS USERS TO CONSTRUCT A PUBLIC OR SEMIPUBLIC
PROFILE FOR THE PURPOSES OF SIGNING INTO AND USING THE SERVICE OR
APPLICATION; AND
(IV) ALLOWS USERS TO POPULATE A PUBLIC LIST OF OTHER
USERS WITH WHOM AN INDIVIDUAL SHARES A SOCIAL CONNECTION WITHIN THE
SYSTEM.

SENATE BILL 697 3
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY WITH RESPECT TO CANDIDATES FOR
PUBLIC STATE OR LOCAL OFFICES IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM THAT KNOWINGLY AND PURPOSELY
ALTERS ITS ALGORITHM TO AMPLIFY POLITICAL CONTENT TO USERS THAT IS
BENEFICIAL TO A CLEARLY IDENTIFIED CANDIDATE FOR THE PURPOSE OF
INFLUENCING AN ELECTION IS PRESUMED TO HAVE MADE AN INDEPENDENT
EXPENDITURE IF:
(I) THE ALTERATION TO THE ALGORITHM IS MADE WITHOUT:
1. A LEGITIMATE BUSINESS PURPOSE OR STANDARD
POLICY FOR EDITORIAL CONTROL AND JUDGMENT BEFORE AN ELECTION; AND
2. THE COOPERATION, CONSULTATION,
UNDERSTANDING, AGREEMENT, OR CONCERT WITH THE CLEARLY IDENTIFIED
CANDIDATE; AND
(II) THE POLITICAL CONTENT IS NOT PAID ADVERTISING FOR
THE CLEARLY IDENTIFIED CANDIDATE OR A POLITICAL PARTY, AN AGENT OF THE
CANDIDATE OR A POLITICAL PARTY, OR A CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY.
(2) THE VALUE OF AN INDEPENDENT EXPENDITURE MADE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE DETERMINED BY THE FAIR MARKET
VALUE OF THE COST TO BOOST CONTENT ON THE SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM BASED
ON:
(I) THE FACTORS USED BY THE SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM TO
DETERMINE COSTS; AND
(II) THE ACTUAL EFFECT OF THE ALTERATIONS TO THE
ALGORITHM.
(D) A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM MAY REBUT THE PRESUMPTION UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION BY PRESENTING SUFFICIENT CONTRARY
EVIDENCE AND OBTAINING A DECLARATORY RULING FROM THE STATE BOARD
THAT:
(1) THE ALTERATION TO THE ALGORITHM WAS NOT FOR THE
PURPOSE OF INFLUENCING AN ELECTION;
(2) THE AMPLIFIED POLITICAL CONTENT WAS THE RESULT OF
ORGANIC VIRALITY; OR

SENATE BILL 697
(3) A LEGITIMATE BUSINESS PURPOSE OR EDITORIAL CONTROL OVER
CONTENT MODERATION WAS NOT THE RESULT OF THE ADVANCEMENT OF A
SPECIFIC POLITICAL VIEWPOINT OR IDEOLOGY.
(E) A PERSON THAT IS DEEMED TO MAKE AN INDEPENDENT EXPENDITURE
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION AND WILLFULLY AND KNOWINGLY FAILS
TO FILE A REPORT AS REQUIRED UNDER § 13–306 OF THIS TITLE IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING 300%
OF THE AMOUNT BY WHICH THE INDEPENDENT EXPENDITURE MADE BY THE PERSON
EXCEEDED THE APPLICABLE CONTRIBUTION LIMIT UNDER § 13–226 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(F) (1) THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR OR THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR’S
DESIGNEE MAY INVESTIGATE A POTENTIAL VIOLATION OF § 13–306 OF THIS TITLE
BY A PERSON WHO IS DEEMED TO HAVE MADE AN INDEPENDENT EXPENDITURE
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR OR THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR’S
DESIGNEE SHALL:
(I) NOTIFY A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM THAT IS SUBJECT TO AN
INVESTIGATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION OF THE CIRCUMSTANCES THAT GAVE
RISE TO THE INVESTIGATION; AND
(II) PROVIDE THE SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM AMPLE
OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD AT A PUBLIC MEETING OF THE STATE BOARD.
(3) (I) IN FURTHERANCE OF AN INVESTIGATION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR OR THE STATE
ADMINISTRATOR’S DESIGNEE MAY ISSUE A SUBPOENA FOR THE ATTENDANCE OF A
WITNESS TO TESTIFY OR THE PRODUCTION OF RECORDS.
(II) A SUBPOENA ISSUED UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE
SERVED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND RULES.
(III) IN ORDER FOR A SUBPOENA TO BE ISSUED UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL MAKE A FINDING THAT THE
SUBPOENA IS NECESSARY TO AND IN FURTHERANCE OF AN INVESTIGATION BEING
CONDUCTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(IV) ANY FILING SUBMITTED TO A COURT WITH RESPECT TO A
SUBPOENA UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE SEALED SHIELDED ON FILING.

SENATE BILL 697 5
(V) IF A PERSON FAILS TO COMPLY WITH A SUBPOENA ISSUED
UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH, ON PETITION OF THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR, A CIRCUIT
COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION MAY COMPEL COMPLIANCE WITH THE
SUBPOENA.
(4) AT THE CONCLUSION OF THE INVESTIGATION AND FOLLOWING
THE HEARING UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE STATE BOARD
SHALL ISSUE A PUBLIC REPORT OF ITS FINDINGS AND MAY:
(I) IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5)
OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE STATE BOARD DETERMINES THAT THE SOCIAL MEDIA
PLATFORM HAS UNINTENTIONALLY VIOLATED § 13–306 OF THIS TITLE; OR
(II) REFER THE MATTER FOR FURTHER INVESTIGATION BY THE
STATE PROSECUTOR IF THE STATE BOARD HAS REASONABLE CAUSE TO BELIEVE
THAT THE SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM HAS WILLFULLY AND KNOWINGLY VIOLATED
THIS SECTION.
(5) A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER PARAGRAPH (4)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) SHALL BE ASSESSED IN THE MANNER SPECIFIED IN §
13–604.1 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(II) MAY NOT EXCEED:
1. 100% OF THE AMOUNT BY WHICH THE INDEPENDENT
EXPENDITURE MADE BY THE SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM EXCEEDED THE APPLICABLE
CONTRIBUTION LIMIT UNDER § 13–226 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
2. 100% OF THE AMOUNT BY WHICH THE INDEPENDENT
EXPENDITURE OF WHICH THE CANDIDATE OR POLITICAL PARTY WAS THE
BENEFICIARY EXCEEDED THE APPLICABLE CONTRIBUTION LIMIT UNDER § 13–226
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(G) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
FINE OR PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE PAID BY THE SOCIAL
MEDIA PLATFORM THAT COMMITTED THE VIOLATION.
(2) A CANDIDATE MAY NOT BE HELD JOINTLY AND SEVERALLY
LIABLE FOR A FINE OR PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION UNLESS A COURT
OR THE STATE BOARD FINDS THAT THE CANDIDATE ENGAGED IN CONDUCT THAT
CONSTITUTES COORDINATION WITH A PERSON UNDER THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 697
(H) A FINE OR PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
DISTRIBUTED TO THE FAIR CAMPAIGN FINANCING FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER §
15–103 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(I) THE STATE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
13–401.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Bot” means an automated online account where all or substantially all
of the actions or posts of that account are not the result of a person.
(3) “CONTENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 13–251 OF THIS
TITLE.
(4) “FOREIGN NATIONAL” MEANS:
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A CITIZEN OF A FOREIGN COUNTRY;
(II) A GOVERNMENT OF A FOREIGN COUNTRY OR OF A
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF A FOREIGN COUNTRY;
(III) A FOREIGN POLITICAL PARTY; OR
(IV) AN INDIVIDUAL, A PARTNERSHIP, AN ASSOCIATION, A
CORPORATION, AN ORGANIZATION, OR ANY OTHER COMBINATION OF INDIVIDUALS
ORGANIZED UNDER THE LAWS OF OR HAVING ITS PRINCIPAL PLACE OF BUSINESS IN
A FOREIGN COUNTRY.
[(3)] (5) “Online” means appearing on any public–facing Internet website,
web application, or digital application, including a social network or publication.
(6) “POLITICAL CONTENT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 13–251 OF
THIS TITLE.
(b) (1) This section applies to any candidate, campaign finance entity, person
required to register under § 13–306, § 13–307, or § 13–309.2 of this title, or an agent of a
candidate, campaign finance entity, or person required to register under § 13–306, §
13–307, or § 13–309.2 of this title.
(2) In addition to the requirements under §§ 13–401 and 13–403 of this
subtitle, a person subject to this section that uses a bot to publish, distribute, or disseminate

SENATE BILL 697 7
campaign material online to another person in the State for the purpose of influencing an
election shall disclose in a clear and conspicuous manner on the campaign material that
the person is using a bot to publish, distribute, or disseminate the campaign material.
(3) If a person subject to this section violates the requirement under
paragraph (2) of this subsection, the State Board may seek to remove the bot.
(C) (1) A FOREIGN NATIONAL MAY NOT USE A BOT TO:
(I) PUBLISH, DISTRIBUTE, OR DISSEMINATE CAMPAIGN
MATERIAL ONLINE TO A PERSON IN THE STATE FOR THE PURPOSE OF INFLUENCING
AN ELECTION; OR
(II) ARTIFICIALLY AMPLIFY POLITICAL CONTENT TO USERS OF
AN ONLINE PLATFORM FOR THE PURPOSE OF INFLUENCING AN ELECTION.
(2) IF THE STATE BOARD DETERMINES THAT THERE HAS BEEN A
VIOLATION OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE STATE BOARD MAY SEEK
TO REMOVE THE BOT.
[(c)] (D) This section does not impose a duty on service providers of online
platforms, including web hosting and Internet service providers.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.